Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256B.0909] LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS DECISION REVIEWS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Notice of intent to deny, reduce, suspend, or terminate required. new text end new text begin At least ten calendar days prior to issuing a written notice of action, a lead agency must provide in a format accessible to the person or the person's legal representative, if any, a notice of the lead agency's intent to deny, reduce, suspend, or terminate a person's access to or eligibility for: new text end new text begin (1) home and community-based waiver eligibility, including level of care determinations, under sections 256B.092 and 256B.49; new text end new text begin (2) specific home and community-based services available under sections 256B.092 and 256B.49; new text end new text begin (3) consumer-directed community supports; new text end new text begin (4) the following state plan services: new text end new text begin (i) personal care assistance services under section 256B.0625, subdivisions 19a and 19c; new text end new text begin (ii) consumer support grants under section 256.476; or new text end new text begin (iii) community first services and supports under section 256B.85; new text end new text begin (5) semi-independent living services under section 252.275; new text end new text begin (6) relocation targeted case management services available under section 256B.0621, subdivision 2, clause (4); new text end new text begin (7) case management services targeted to vulnerable adults or people with developmental disabilities under section 256B.0924; new text end new text begin (8) case management services targeted to people with developmental disabilities under Minnesota Rules, part 9525.0016; and new text end new text begin (9) necessary diagnostic information to gain access to or determine eligibility for services specified under clauses (5) to (8). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Opportunity to respond required. new text end new text begin A lead agency must provide the person or the person's legal representative, if any, the opportunity to respond to the agency's intent to deny, reduce, suspend, or terminate eligibility or access to the services described in subdivision 1. A lead agency must provide the person or the person's legal representative ten days to respond. If the person or the person's legal representative elects to respond, the agency must contact the person or the person's legal representative and initiate a decision review. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Decision review. new text end new text begin (a) A lead agency must initiate a decision review for any person who responds under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (b) If a timely request for a decision review is received, the lead agency must schedule the conference within five days of the request. The lead agency must conduct the decision review in a manner that allows for an opportunity for interactive communication between the person or the person's legal representative, if any, and a representative of the lead agency who has specific knowledge of the proposed decision and the basis for the decision. The interactive communication must be in a format that is accessible to the person, and may include a telephone call, written exchange, in-person meeting, or other format as chosen by the person or the person's legal representative. new text end new text begin (c) During the decision review, the representative of the lead agency must provide a thorough explanation of the lead agency's intent to deny, reduce, suspend, or terminate eligibility or access to the services described in subdivision 1 and provide the person or the person's legal representative an opportunity to ask questions about the decision. If the lead agency's explanation of the decision is based on a misunderstanding of the person's circumstances, incomplete information, missing documentation, or similar missing or inaccurate information, the lead agency must provide the person or the person's legal representative an opportunity to provide clarifying or additional information. new text end new text begin (d) A person with a representative is not required to participate in the decision review. A person may also elect to have someone of the person's choosing participate in the decision review. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Continuation of services. new text end new text begin During the decision review and until the lead agency issues a written notice of action to deny, reduce, suspend, or terminate the eligibility or access, the person must continue to receive covered services. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Notice of action. new text end new text begin Following a decision review, a lead agency may issue a notice of action to deny, reduce, suspend, or terminate the eligibility or access after considering the discussions and information provided during the decision review. The notice shall incorporate additional information and relevant facts from the decision review. The notice, written in English, must include the Department of Human Services language block. The notice must be mailed to the person and the person's legal representative, if any. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Appeal rights. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect a person's appeal rights under section 256.045. new text end